Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202585-2622
State university, state college, or community college; procedures, rules, and regulations.

Each state university, state college, or community college shall adopt and promulgate the procedures, rules, and regulations necessary to carry out the First Responder Recruitment and Retention Act.

Laws 2016, LB906, § 4;

Laws 2023, LB727, § 111;

R.S.1943, (2024), § 85-2604;

Laws 2025, LB608, § 15.